New Jersey, session 221, S558.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person who performs caddie services for a fee or other compensation on a golf course shall be considered an independent contractor for purposes of State law. b.    Caddie services performed for a fee or other compensation on a golf course shall not be considered employment for purposes of the "unemployment compensation law," R.S.43:21-1 et seq., the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et seq.), the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., P.L.1965, c.173 (C.34:11-4.1 et seq.) or other applicable State tax laws, the workers compensation law, R.S.34:15-1 et seq., or the "New Jersey State Wage and Hour Law," P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.